Hawaii statutes.
§183D-32 Open and closed seasons and bag
limits on game birds. (a) No person shall intentionally, knowingly, or
recklessly take, kill, pursue, or have in possession any bird declared as a
game bird by law or by rule of the department at any time, except during an
open season duly established and designated by the department for taking,
killing, or possessing the same, or except as provided in sections 183D-21,
183D-33, 183D-34, 183D-35, 183D-36, 183D-37, 183D-38, 183D-39, 183D-40,
183D-41, or 183D-42.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed
as making it unlawful for any person to possess under refrigeration, a number
of game birds, legally killed, greater than that fixed as a bag limit by any
rule of the department, but not in excess of the daily bag limit for five days.
[L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next